California, session 20252026, AB2080.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 27000.1 of the Government Code is amended to read:27000.1. (a) Notwithstanding Section 53607, the board of supervisors may delegate to the county treasurer the authority to invest or reinvest the funds of the county and the funds of other depositors in the county treasury, pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 53600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5. 5 if the county investment policy requires the county treasurer to do both the following:(1) Make a monthly report of transactions to the legislative body.(2) Make a quarterly report as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 53646.(b) The county treasurer shall thereafter assume full responsibility for those transactions until the board of supervisors revokes its delegation of authority.(c)After a delegation pursuant to subdivision (a), in the county investment policy, the board of supervisors shall set monthly or quarterly reporting requirements for the county treasurer.(d)(c) This section shall not limit the county treasurer’s authority pursuant to Section 53635 or 53684.SEC. 2. Section 53607 of the Government Code is amended to read:53607. Except as provided in Section 27000.1, the authority of the legislative body to invest or to reinvest funds of a local agency, or to sell or exchange securities so purchased, may be delegated for a one-year period by the legislative body to the treasurer of the local agency, who shall thereafter assume full responsibility for those transactions until the delegation of authority is revoked or expires, and shall make a monthly report of those transactions to the legislative body. Subject to review, the legislative body may renew the delegation of authority pursuant to this section each year.